Utah statutes.
39-1-30.   Officers of National Guard -- Commissions.
(1)  All officers of the National Guard shall be appointed by the governor,
subject to the approval of the National Guard Bureau, or subject to approval
as prescribed by the laws of the United States or related rules or regulations
governing the National Guard.
(2)  An officer may not be commissioned unless he successfully passes tests,
both physical and mental, as prescribed by the National Guard Bureau, and
unless he has taken the oath prescribed by the laws of the United States, is a
citizen of the United States, and has been selected from one of the following
classes:
(a)  officers or enlisted members of the National Guard;
(b)  officers on the reserve or unassigned list of the National Guard;
(c)  officers active or retired;
(d)  former officers of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps,
or National Guard;
(e)  graduates from the service of the United States military, air, and naval
academies, or graduates of schools, colleges, and universities where a course
in military science, as prescribed by the National Guard Bureau, is taught
under the supervision of an officer of the regular army or regular air force;
and
(f)  for the technical branches and staff corps or departments, other
civilians as are especially qualified for that duty.
(3)  However, officers appointed to staff corps or departments, or other staff
positions, including officers of the pay, inspection, subsistence, and medical
departments, shall have had previous military experience, and hold their
positions until they shall have reached 64 years of age, unless separated
prior to that time by resignation, disability, or for other causes to be
determined by a military court, court-martial, or other legally organized
board convened for that purpose.   Vacancies among these officers shall be
filled by appointment as provided in this section.
